Arkansas, session 2025, HB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES. There is
hereby established for the Department of Human Services - Secretary's Office
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC008 SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES 1 GRADE SE05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES. There is
*LCW012*
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from
the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for personal services of the Department of Human Services - Secretary's
Office for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $287,042
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 68,678
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $355,720

SECTION 3. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Secretary's Office for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N255N DHS CHIEF DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE SE04
(2) L023N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE SE03
(3) N040N DHS CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 2 GRADE SE02
(4) N233N DHS CHIEF OF BUSINESS OPERATIONS 1 GRADE SE02
(5) N232N DHS DEPUTY CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE SE02
(6) A136C DHS MEDICAID CHIEF FINANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE SE02
(7) N027N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR ADULT SERVICES 1 GRADE SE01
(8) G029N DHS DIRECTOR OF POLICY AND LEGAL 2 GRADE SE01
(9) L009C NURSE MANAGER 1 GRADE MP03
(10) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 3 GRADE IT10
(11) D025N DHS IT SENIOR ENGINEER 4 GRADE IT09
(12) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 3 GRADE IT09
(13) D123C DB ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT08
(14) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 8 GRADE IT08
(15) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE IT07
(16) D025C STATE IT SECURITY SPECIALIST 3 GRADE IT06
(17) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
(18) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 12 GRADE IT05
(19) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC 7 GRADE IT05
(20) D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER 1 GRADE IT05
(21) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 7 GRADE IT05
(22) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(23) D062C DATABASE ANALYST 4 GRADE IT04
(24) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(25) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(26) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT03
(27) D075C SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE IT03
(28) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 9 GRADE IT02
(29) R048C DHS CHIEF HUMAN RESOURCES OFFICER 1 GRADE GS15
(30) N244N DHS CHIEF OF COMMUNICATION 1 GRADE GS15
(31) A131C DHS CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER 1 GRADE GS15
(32) N016N DHS DEP DIR ADMINISTRATIVE SVCS 2 GRADE GS15
(33) N231N DHS DEPUTY CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
(34) N086N DHS DDS DIR EVAL PLAN & MGMT SYSTEMS 1 GRADE GS14
(35) N142N DHS/DAAS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(36) N102N DHS/DCO ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(37) N101N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR PGM & ADMN SPT 1 GRADE GS14
(38) N099N DHS/DMS ADD - LONG TERM CARE 1 GRADE GS14
(39) N100N DHS/DMS ADD - MEDICAL SERVICES 4 GRADE GS14
(40) N080N DHS/DMS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR - FISCAL 1 GRADE GS14
(41) N124N DHS/DYS ASSISTANT DIVISION DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS14
(42) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(43) G290C ASST DEPUTY DIR OF LEGISLATIVE AFRS 1 GRADE GS13
(44) N128N DHS ASST DIR QUALITY ASSURANCE 1 GRADE GS13
(45) D026N DHS ELIGIBILITY SYSTEM PROGRAM MGR 3 GRADE GS13
(46) G054N DHS GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(47) N108N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR 1 GRADE GS13
(48) N107N DHS/OFA ASSISTANT DIR - ACCTNG OPS 2 GRADE GS13
(49) N109N DHS/OFA ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(50) G019C GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(51) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 2 GRADE GS13
(52) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 2 GRADE GS12
(53) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS12
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
(54) G024C DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 2 GRADE GS12
(55) G042C DHS ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 6 GRADE GS12
(56) G101C DHS AREA MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(57) P004N DHS DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC RELATIONS 3 GRADE GS12
(58) A016C DHS DMS BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 4 GRADE GS12
(59) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 4 GRADE GS12
(60) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE GS12
(61) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(62) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 7 GRADE GS11
(63) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 58 GRADE GS11
(64) G022C DHS DIRECTOR OF EMERGENCY OPERATIONS 1 GRADE GS11
(65) A024C DHS DIVISION CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS11
(66) G027N DHS RESEARCH ANALYSIS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(67) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 5 GRADE GS10
(68) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(69) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS10
(70) L010C DHS DMS MEDICAL ASSISTANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(71) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS09
(72) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(73) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 7 GRADE GS09
(74) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(75) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(76) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(77) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 3 GRADE GS08
(78) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 3 GRADE GS08
(79) A056C DHS FINANCIAL SECTION MANAGER 7 GRADE GS08
(80) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 20 GRADE GS08
(81) G129C DHS/DCO PROGRAM MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(82) E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(83) A047C FINANCIAL ANALYST II 3 GRADE GS08
(84) A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS08
(85) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 7 GRADE GS08
(86) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS08
(87) V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(88) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(89) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
(90) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 19 GRADE GS08
(91) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(92) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 7 GRADE GS07
(93) G181C ACOM DWS PROGRAM MONITOR 2 GRADE GS07
(94) G138C AGENCY ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OFFICER 5 GRADE GS07
(95) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 11 GRADE GS07
(96) A081C AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS07
(97) V008C BUYER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(98) P065C DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS07
(99) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS07
(100) M042C DHS STAFF SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(101) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(102) M040C FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(103) A076C FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST 2 GRADE GS07
(104) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 2 GRADE GS07
(105) X125C FRAUD INVESTIGATOR COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(106) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(107) L048C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS07
(108) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(109) A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(110) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 1 GRADE GS07
(111) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(112) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(113) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 16 GRADE GS06
(114) M045C ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES WORKER 4 GRADE GS06
(115) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 14 GRADE GS06
(116) R026C CIVIL RIGHTS/EMPLOYEE RELATIONS COORD 1 GRADE GS06
(117) G170C DHS ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OFFICER 6 GRADE GS06
(118) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 13 GRADE GS06
(119) P021C EDITOR 1 GRADE GS06
(120) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 11 GRADE GS06
(121) X156C FRAUD INVESTIGATOR 3 GRADE GS06
(122) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 10 GRADE GS06
(123) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(124) P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GRADE GS06
(125) L053C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS06
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
(126) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 13 GRADE GS06
(127) R029C HUMAN RESOURCES RECRUITER 5 GRADE GS06
(128) X101C INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(129) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 8 GRADE GS06
(130) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(131) P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(132) G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(133) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(134) A084C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDIT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(135) X136C QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWER 1 GRADE GS06
(136) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(137) G202C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(138) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(139) A088C ASSETS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(140) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(141) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(142) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(143) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 16 GRADE GS05
(144) L070C HEALTH CARE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(145) D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(146) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REP 6 GRADE GS05
(147) C040C LEASING SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(148) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS05
(149) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 8 GRADE GS05
(150) V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS05
(151) A101C ACCOUNTING TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(152) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 13 GRADE GS04
(153) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 15 GRADE GS04
(154) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(155) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 34 GRADE GS04
(156) C044C MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(157) A097C PAYROLL TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(158) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS04
(159) V021C SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT 1 GRADE GS04
(160) V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(161) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 6 GRADE GS03
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
(162) V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS03
(163) C062C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST 1 GRADE GS03
(164) S054C PRINTER 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 650

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Secretary's Office for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: twenty-eight (28) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Secretary's
Office for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $38,443,782
(02) EXTRA HELP 298,556
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 14,099,810
(04) OVERTIME 8,383
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,571,873
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 59,433
(C) PROF. FEES 8,861,800
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 400,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 2,016,710
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $69,760,347

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - VARIOUS BUILDING CONSTRUCTION. There is
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from
the Department of Human Services Renovation Fund, for construction,
renovation, maintenance, equipment, and repairs for various buildings
operated by the Department of Human Services - Secretary's Office for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONSTRUCTION $15,914,729

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - CONSOLIDATED COST. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the DHS
Consolidated Cost Revolving Fund, for operating expenses of the Department of
Human Services - Secretary's Office - Consolidated Cost for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $800,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 21,500
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $821,500

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS PAYING. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
purchase of services of the Department of Human Services - Secretary's Office
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PURCHASE OF SERVICES $129,084

04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SECRETARY'S OFFICE/OFFICE OF CHIEF COUNSEL - PURCHASE OF EVIDENCE. Upon
approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Chief Counsel for the
Department of Human Services may transfer an amount up to but not to exceed
$12,000 and deposit same in a bank account for the purpose of purchasing
evidence in the course of investigating the illegal use of food
stamps/Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) cards. The funds so transferred
shall be subject to accounting in a manner substantially similar to that
employed by the Arkansas State Police for such transactions; provided
however, that information tending to identify participants in such
transactions shall be exempt from the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. HUMAN
SERVICES RENOVATION FUND. Department of Human Services Renovation Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, Auditor
of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the
Department of Human Services Renovation Fund.
(b) This fund shall be used for constructing, acquiring, renovating,
maintaining, repairing, and equipping facilities of the Department of Human
Services and for paying disallowances by the federal government.
(c) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Federal reimbursement received by the Department of Human Services and
deposited in the various fund accounts of the department; and
(2) General revenues transferred from the Division of Youth Services, the
Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services, and the Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services for the purposes of repairing,
renovating, equipping, acquiring and constructing Department of Human
Services facilities with an annual maximum of five million dollars
($5,000,000). The projects for which these transfers are authorized must be
projects which were unanticipated during the preceding regular session of the
Arkansas General Assembly and must be projects which, if not carried out in
the interim period between regular sessions of the Arkansas General Assembly
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
would cause greater harm to the facilities, clients or programs of the
Department of Human Services than to wait until the next regular session.
(3) Other non-general revenue funds as may be available within the Department
of Human Services that can be used for the purposes of this fund.
(d)(1) At the request of the Secretary of the Department of Human
Services, and upon certification of the availability of such funds, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall initiate the necessary transfer documents
to reflect the transfer on the books of record of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and the Department
of Human Services.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall submit any
transfer plan to and must receive approval of the plan from the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, the Governor and the Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee prior to the effective date of the transfer.
(e) Provided, that any non-general revenue funding that may remain in the
fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried over into the next fiscal
year and all obligated general revenue funding that may remain in the fund at
the end of any fiscal year shall be carried over into the next fiscal year to
satisfy such legal and contractual obligations that have been entered into
prior to the end of the fiscal year.
(f) Determining the amount of funds appropriated to a state agency is the
prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating specific line items and by identifying the appropriation and
funding attached to that line item. The General Assembly has determined that
the Department of Human Services could be operated more efficiently if some
flexibility is given to that agency. That flexibility is being accomplished
by providing transfer authority in subsection (d) of this section, and since
the General Assembly has granted the agency broad powers under the transfer
authority concept, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the transfer authority by
requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
in the utilization of this transfer authority. Therefore, the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER AUTHORITY. The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall
have transfer authority provided by the following:
(a) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES RENOVATION FUND. The Secretary of the
Department of Human Services is authorized to request fund transfers
according to the provisions established by Arkansas Code Ann. 19-5-1020,
Department of Human Services Renovation Fund, as amended herein; and
(b) MATCH TRANSFER. The Secretary of the Department of Human Services,
with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, is authorized to
effect inter-agency and inter-divisional fund transfers for the purpose of
providing the State's matching share for payments made to that Division or
Office or its service providers for services eligible for federal
reimbursement under programs administered by the Department of Human
Services. The Department of Human Services shall report to the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee on a quarterly basis all fund transfers
made in accordance with the authority granted by this section; and
(c) REALLOCATION OF RESOURCES: (1) The Department of Human Services (DHS)
provides hundreds of different services to over 1 million Arkansans. The
specific mix of service needs and the funding and staffing required to
provide them can vary significantly based on many factors, including natural
disasters, changing federal mandates and funding sources, demographic shifts,
fluctuating court-ordered services, social trends, and job market variations
such as nursing shortages. The impact of these factors through the course of
any fiscal year make it very difficult for the Department to accurately
predict the exact needs for funding, appropriation and positions in each of
its over 100 different appropriations. To ensure that it can respond quickly
to changing client needs and make the most effective use of the resources
allocated to it, the Department of Human Services shall be authorized to
utilize the reallocation of resource authority to make the proper adjustments
to the budgets within the Department. Therefore, upon determination by the
Secretary of the Department of Human Services that a reallocation of
resources within the department is necessary for the efficient and effective
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
operation of the department, the Secretary, with approval of the Governor,
shall have the authority to request, from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, a transfer of positions, appropriations, line item appropriations, and
funds within or between existing and newly created divisions, offices,
sections, or units of the department. Provided, however, that no transfer of
funds or appropriation that provides direct support or matching support for
the Arkansas Medicaid Program shall be made to any other fund account or
appropriation that does not directly support the Arkansas Medicaid Program.
Further, no positions, funds, or appropriation authorized during the budget
process for the Division of Children and Family Services' compliance with
initiatives established under the Angela R. consent decree shall be
transferred to any other division. Nothing in this provision is intended to
prevent the one-time transfers of savings in any other program to the
Arkansas Medicaid Program, with the exception of the provisions previously
cited for the Division of Children and Family Services – Angela R. consent
decree. The Division of Developmental Disabilities – Grants to Community
Providers line item of the Developmental Disabilities Services - Grants-in-
Aid appropriation may not be decreased. The appropriation, funding, and
positions provided for the five Human Development Centers shall remain at a
level sufficient to ensure quality care for the Centers' residents. The
exemptions provided in this subsection whereby certain DHS Programs and
Divisions are protected from appropriation, fund, or position transfers are
applicable only to the reallocation or transfer authority granted herein, and
not by any reductions which are applicable to all state programs.
The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall submit any
requests for transfers to and must receive approval of the requests for
transfers from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Governor, and the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee prior to the effective
date of the transfers. Provided, however, that the Department of Human
Services shall be limited to submitting no more than four reallocation of
resources transfer requests during any fiscal year. In each Departmental
request no single division will request reallocation for more than one
purpose as listed in this section. Transfer authority for unforeseen purposes
shall further be limited to no more than 5% of the total appropriation,
funding, and positions authorized for the Department. Reallocation of
resources transfers may include multiple items but shall be limited to the
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
following purposes:
i) Medicaid Program;
ii) Facilities and institutions costs, including operational expenses and
construction/renovation/equipping expenses;
iii) Departmental grants and contracts;
iv) Court ordered settlements and payments;
v) Payment of administrative expenses, including but not limited to, overtime
and other costs of personnel for critical services or functions necessary to
carry out the mission of the agency;
vi) Restructuring efforts as deemed necessary to comply with new and/or
unanticipated federal or state mandates; and/or
vii) Redirecting internal resources, both direct and/or indirect, to meet
client needs and services.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has
determined that the Department of Human Services may operate more efficiently
if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Human Services
authorizing broad powers under the Reallocation of Resources provisions
herein. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The
requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional
by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
(2) If it is determined that the requested reallocation of resources
transfers should be made, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall then
initiate the necessary transfer documents to reflect the transfers upon the
fiscal records of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, and the Department of Human Services. In
addition, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, together with the Co-
Chairpersons of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, may
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
approve, on an emergency basis, requests for utilization of this Section
without prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee, with any such actions reported at the next meeting of the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL, AND TEMPORARY LAW. Arkansas
State Hospital — Insurance reimbursements and unspent set-aside funds for
repairs recoupment.
(a) An insurance reimbursement received by the Department of Human
Services to reimburse funds that were transferred from the EBD or Contingency
Set-Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund for critical storm damage repair for
the Arkansas State Hospital shall be transferred, as the insurance
reimbursement is received, on the books of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, the Treasurer of State, and the Auditor of State from the appropriate
fund or fund account into which the department deposited the insurance
reimbursement payment to:
(1) The EBD or Contingency Set-Aside in the Restricted Reserve
Fund if the EBD or Contingency Set-Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund is
currently active with a balance greater than zero dollars ($0.00); or
(2) The General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund if the EBD or
Contingency Set-Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund is no longer active.
(b) Any funds received by the department for critical storm damage
repair for the Arkansas State Hospital from the EBD or Contingency Set-Aside
in the Restricted Reserve Fund that remain upon completion of the storm
damage repair project shall be transferred as provided for insurance
reimbursements under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall notify the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Performance Evaluation and
Expenditure Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the PEER/Review Subcommittee of the Joint Budget
Committee, of the following to allow for the transfers provided for in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section:
(1) The receipt of an insurance reimbursement by the department
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
for critical storm damage repair for the Arkansas State Hospital; and
(2) Upon completion of the storm damage repair project, the
amount of any remaining funds described in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The department shall report quarterly to the Legislative Council
or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee:
(1) The status of the storm damage repair project;
(2) The projected completion time lines for the storm damage
repair project;
(3) The total amount of the insurance reimbursements received by
the department to date for the storm damage repair project; and
(4) Any remaining balance of the original five million dollars
($5,000,000) transferred to the department from the EBD or Contingency Set-
Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund.
(e) This section is effective on July 1, 2024, and until the final
transfer of funds has been made as provided in this section.


SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL, AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES COMPREHENSIVE AGENCY REVIEW. The Arkansas
Legislative Council - Hospital and Medicaid Study Subcommittee shall perform
a comprehensive review of the Department of Human Services, which shall
commence at the direction of the co-chairs of the Arkansas Legislative
Council, in consultation with the subcommittee co-chairs. This review shall
include, but is not limited to: administrative policies and functions,
personnel and staffing evaluations, and revenues and expenditures of the
department, divisions, and providers. The subcommittee shall prioritize the
review as follows: the Shared Services division, the Division of Children and
Family Services, and the Division of County Operations, with further
prioritization of divisions to be determined by the subcommittee. The review
shall include input and recommendations from the Attorney General's Medicaid
Fraud Unit and the Department of Inspector General's office.
The preliminary recommendations and report shall be completed within
six months of the subcommittee‘s initial meeting. Upon completion of this
preliminary report, the subcommittee shall provide the department, the
Governor, and the Arkansas Legislative Council with a report to include
04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
recommendations and desired metrics with expected timelines of completion to
meet the desired outcomes provided in the preliminary report. At the
direction of the chair of the Arkansas Legislative Council - Hospital and
Medicaid Study Subcommittee, the subcommittee may add recommendations and
approve and review actions by the department in accordance with the
preliminary recommendations.
The final report and outcomes, including recommending legislation to
address findings, shall be presented at the final Arkansas Legislative
Council meeting of the 95th General Assembly.
The Department of Human Services shall report to the subcommittee
monthly the status of implementation of the recommendations with review and
approval of all steps taken to meet the metrics and desired outcomes of the
department in accordance with the recommendations by the subcommittee and by
the Arkansas Legislative Council.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 14. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 15. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/10/25 HB1105
SECTION 16. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee























04-10-2025 16:54:28 LCW012